When you were sixteen as your grandma died of an illness. One of the last things she said to you was something that will stick with you your entire life.
"Anon, baby. There are two types of people in this world. The ones who have it and the ones that don't. This world is a cruel one...Whatever you do don't let it break you. Your parents were weak...don't blame them too hard...you shouldn't let hatred ruin your life..."
You took those words to heart. You didn't even shed a tear that day. Given that you cried like a bitch later that week you decided to live by the words your grandma gave you when she died — abandoned by your deadbeat parents when you were five that left your grandma to raise you. When she died, the government found you a temporary family that all that you lived with until you finished high school.

They were nice folk. Real straight laced and treated you nice. You didn’t need much when you were a kid anyways. You were introverted and studied ,most of the time. The fostered parents liked that so we got along nicely.
After those two miserable and uneventful years you passed and went to college and graduated thanks to the money your grandma saved plus the money you got working, and the money from selling the house grandma left you.
Luck must have been on your side now because you received a letter in the mail that you had an uncle living on the west coast that died at sea on a boating accident five years ago. Turns put he put you down as a recipient in his will. they wanted to know if you wanted to keep or sell the condo that he owned over in a town called Ripperton.

“Ripperton? Never heard of that town before. I hope it’s not one of those dangerous cities you heard about on the internet.”
After a quick search on Zoogle, you realized that it's densely populated beach town off the coast of filled with mostly Anthro residents.
"Wow. This place looks sweet. Beautiful scenery, good weather and I always wanted to learn how to surf." you said as you leaned back in your chair. “But it’s mostly filled with anthros, I would stick out like a sore thumb...well human thumb”
As you browsed through the pages on the internet, you found the town's web page. The town's population is mostly anthros. In particular shark anthros, it appears that Ripperton became a ghost town due to the costs of resources and lack of funds to keep the little port town on the coast afloat. However, a bunch of wealthy anthros shark immigrants, namely The Whitlerton family came and made plans to make the city thriving again. By building beautiful new houses and reopening the port, it didn't take long for this town to be placed to be a mecca for beach dwellers. Thus Ripperton became the hotspot of Shark culture due to the beach scene and nightlife that developed in the past 200 years of shark inhabitants.

You've been moving on autopilot after Grandma died. You lost your best friend, parent and therapist all at once. This was a feeling of loneliness that you knew that was inside of your closet. You just knew once this came out that you will self destruct and you know that you can’t afford to do that. It would be nice to enjoy some time off of work and get yourself together. Maybe I will find a nice girl there to introduce to grandma there.

"Holy fuck! These prices are ridiculous. This would be two months worth of rent. Fuck it, might as well do it nicely for once. Hell if I don't like it I'll sell the dude's place ." you thought.
"Let's just hope the place is beautiful."
***
"Let me help you with that, Mrs Malinowski."

The plane ride was better than expected. You had the luck to have a nice old pigeon lady called Mrs Malinowski as your neighbor; She reminded you of your grandmother in a weird pigeon-lady sort of way. You two talked about the weather and her granddaughter who just started college. She also gave you some of the bread she baked before the flight.


"Oh, thank you. It's rare to see such a nice young man being so helpful these days. Usually, they would ignore a little old lady like me. If only my granddaughter can bring a nice man like you home, I can stop being so worried about her getting in trouble."

"It's no problem at all ma-am" as you finished loading her bags into the taxi.

"No No No young man you deserve a reward. If you ever have time during your stay visit my bakery on 4th street, you can't miss it. We make the best paczkis in Ripperton. I'll make you batch fresh on the house."

“I’ll be sure to stop by Mrs Malinowski. Be safe, ok?

After helping Mrs Malinowski into the taxi, you decided to get an uber to get your uncle's condo. Uber drivers have a good understanding of what's going on in the city. Or that's what you like to tell yourself. You just wanted to get a real locals perspective on what there is to do around here. And hopefully "Eric" is the right guy for the job.


Plopping yourself on a nearby bench, you finally have to realise how fucking hot it is in this town. Even in a pair of shorts and a T-shirt, you feel like you are melting.


"How the fuck is global warming not fucking real" you groaned as you fanned yourself under the shade.

You noticed a girl walking down the street wearing a pair of what you think are shorts if you could call them that. Calling them "shorts" would be an understatement, her ass was exposed and jiggled as she walked down the street. You, in particular, didn't have a problem with it since you never had the time or pleasure being with a woman.

"Oh god is there a quarter over there or something why is she bend-"

HONK HONK HONK "Hiya are you Anonymous? I'm your Uber driver Eric!" chirped Eric.

Tearing your eyes away from the girl to prevent yourself from embarrassing yourself you noticed your now suddenly annoying driver. He was some type of ferret wearing a pretty cool Hawaiian shirt and a slick pair of golden framed glasses. You wonder how he isn't bursting into flames in this hot weather.

Uh, yea that's me" you replied as you made your way towards the car with your bags.

"Let's get those bags loaded up shall we?"

After you two got everything loaded into the car, you two got in and buckled up and got moving. Eric asked if it was your first time in town. You said You asked if Eric if he knew anything fun to do around the city.

"Sure there's tons of cool stuff to do around here! There carnivals, movies, surfing contests, concerts you name it."
"What kind of concerts are going on today?"
"Well... There's a hot dog eating contest until five today, so I'm guessing the next band that will be playing at The Parley would be...uh at 8pm tonight." Eric said hesitantly.

"Oh, a night concert sounds sick as fuck. What band is playing?"

"I-It's a local shark band called Predator."

"they any good?"
"It's a unique style...I guess, but it's mostly a place for sharks to hang out. I doubt any of them actually listen the music played"

"sounds dope. Guess I can check that out tonight"
"Are you sure you want to go to the Parley?”
You decided to come out here break out of your shell and readjust yourself to meeting others.
“Yea I always wanted to go to the concert beside it’s better than sitting in the house all night.”
The rest of the ride you two shoot the shit about other interesting facts about the city and right places to eat. Eventually, the part of town you arrived it was a bit more "rustic" compared to the rest of the town. Eric pulled the car in front of a shady looking condominium.

"Sheesh, Anon If I knew you were living in a place like this I wouldn't have asked you for a tip."

"It's my uncle's place, not mine. Well.. technically it's my place now since he died."

"Oh, that sucks man."

"Didn't know him, so I don't care."

"well Call me when you need an Uber" you see his eyes dart back to the condos." actually never mind."

"fuck you dude."

"Haha, I'm joking dude chill out. Anyways I'm off; good luck on moving in and all that."


After entering the main door of the lobby a blast of cold, stale air and the smell of dust assaulted your nostrils. "Thank god they at least have A/C."

You shuffled your way over to the front desk, and you realised that there a someone asleep there. Alternating patterns of brown and black scales littered his body and a wrinkly as far as you can tell he's some lizard.

"Excuse me, sir.”

You tap on the uncluttered part of the desk. Still nothing.

"HELLO?" you yelled
"I DIDN'T EAT ANY OF THAT SOUP.” he said as he jolted awake. “Uh oh, it's just you. You better have a good reason for waking me boy." he slowly said while unscrewing a bottle of rum.

"I am Neato's nephew, Anonymous. I am here about the place he owned."
"Oh, your neato's kin. Shame about the man's death, he was a good one. A bad drunk but had an excellent stash of porn."

"Uh, yeah sure."

Well, boy, have you decided on what you wanted to do with the place?"

"How long has it been paid for?"
"Ya have three months left until you have to pay me. Do ya want to sell it? I'll give you a good price for it." said the lizard as he scratched his neck.

"I plan on selling it but not yet. Can you show me to the place?"
"Ah, whatever. Right this way"

The elevator ride up was a quiet one besides the loud pops and grumbles of the shaft. It started to worry you after a while when the elevator began to slow down and speed up randomly at moments. The smell of alcohol was so strong he must had been drinking for a while. Eventually, we arrived at the targeted floor when started to stumble out of the elevator.

"This way... room 304."

You arrived in front of the apartment you noticed a bunch of mail jammed in the mail slot.

"Didn't want to touch nuthin just in case to dodge all that legal mumbo jumbo" he grumbled as he passed you the keys. Ya need to do some cleaning though. Reckon it's been a while since he was last in there."


You opened the door with the keys he gave you, the first thing that hit you was a strong stench of rotten food that almost made you barf. There were stacks of magazines, piles of dirty clothes, tons of DVDs and empty bottles of alcohol everywhere.


"Jesus Christ!" you reeled in disgust. You usually weren't so squeamish, but granny raised you not to be a slob. It looks like you need to spend the rest of the day cleaning. You moved forward to pick up one of the magazines on the floor.

"Big Booty Beach Babes: Shark Sea Snatches 6th Edition?" you reached for a DVD"Human'd: Jenna Jaws?

"Your uncle had a thing for sharks. He obsessed with trying to lay one of them snooty upscale sharks with their health codes and their stupid safety regulations. They need to be knocked down a peg or two? Doncha think boy? Ooh is that the latest issue of shark snatches? I've meant to borrow it from ya uncle. Do ya mind if I have it?"

"Go ahead...I don't mind."
"I can tell we can get along just fine Anonymous" he cackled creepily as he left the room.
You have already decided that you aren't keeping this place based on that creepy landlord. You feel that he's a bit too comfortable with this room. Seems to me that all your uncle did was work drink booze and jerk it to shark girls all day.
"I have to throw all of this shit away. Well. Not everything.." you said as you eyed the shark porn."Might as well see what's all this fuss about shark girls."...



***Moxy
(Regal Apartments, Uptown Ripperton)

"It's not like he doesn’t exist... It's that he's been.. ya know real busy lately," you grumbled on the phone.

"Your father wants you to do something with your life, honey. You are 26 years old, and you waste your life hanging around with those hooligans. I won't be around forever sweetie. I would like to see some pups before I am gone."

"Why cut me off? Isn't this a bit too far? I'm your only child!"
"And that's the reason why we want to meet your boyfriend. We should at least see the man you said you would like to marry. Or did you lie to us that day when you asked us for that new car?"
"HAHAHAHA of course not." you nervously chuckled
" Good. Alright then sweetie I'll see you in a week with that boyfriend of yours. I love you. kisses mwah"

"Love you too Ma...."

"fuck fuck fuck" as you hung up and tossed your phone on your bed. You really screwed yourself with this boyfriend shit. "how in the hell am I going to find a would be husband in a week?"

Getting a boyfriend is child's play for you, so you weren't that interested in getting one in the past. Guys were too easy to read in the past. All they wanted in a girl was big tits,big ass and someone to make their bitch in bed. Ever since high school guys tried to pick you up in the most nonsensical ways. They tried directly, indirectly, with flowers, letters, hell you even had guys fight over you. I feel that attraction and love has to come naturally.

Kinda like love at first sight. A little naive and idealistic but that’s what you want. You want someone who wants you for you in every sense of the word. To experience the climaxes in your life, edge each other past our limits, to share a warm embrace to ease the cold, harsh realities of the world away...and a nice dicking, you like those.

....Did you want to love? Maybe? But that's not important right now. You needed someone who could be a person you could "love" for a weekend so your parents won't cut you off.

You fall back on the bed and laid a pillow over your face for a while. “What should I do” you said mumbling into the pillow.

Ring Ring. You grabbed your phone and answered it.
"Yo"
"MOXIE BABY WHAT UP BITCH?!"
"fuck Sandy chill the fuck out."

"HA! You still coming to the concert tonight? There's gonna be hella hotties there~~ who knows you might get lucky enough to get backstage with one of the band members~" she coaxingly said

"who cares about some expired pieces of shit that can't book any other gig than The Parley. I have more fucking important things to do than that."
“Come on girl. I need you tonight.”
“Don’t wanna. Find someone else”
"Listen I have a date with Billy, and he says he doesn't want to go anywhere unless his friend has a date too. So he asked me if I could hook his friend up. And as I recall I have a single hot ass friend who just so happens to need a good time.

"HA, you need to lay off the weed. You've been saying some crazy shit lately. The last thing is some punk who can weasel a date out of me just because that shithead knows I'm your friend."
“Well... He’s a shithead that you know..
“Are you talking about fucking Billy? Fuck no I’m not doing it.”
"Moxie, honey you still owe me a favour from covering your ass when your parents asked me about your boyfriend. You owe me, and I need a ride. All I need you to do is drop me off and just be there. You don’t have to talk to the dickhead if you don’t want to. Just do me this biggie and I will owe you forever.”
“...Fine. But I won’t talk or do anything with the piece of shit.”
“Thankyouthankyouthank you.”
"Fuck you slut."
"Love you too bitch. I'll see you at eight buh byeeee."

You hung up the phone before she could milk anymore favors out of you. You still don't know why you still hang out with this girl. You've known her since high school, and you have been "best" friends ever since. Schooling was rough for you. Contrary to the belief being part of the city’s founding families makes people...jealous to say the least. You were never really a “normal” shark girl. Dad taught you to be a go-getter and how to carry yourself to make people fear and respect you. Sharks took a while to fully mature mentally compared to other anthros. So when you showed excellence and good bearing it drove a lot of people off from socializing with you. Thus ushering in your bad girl phase in high school.

You had a bad temper and your actions reflected that. You were aggressive, mean, and took no bullshit. I’m surprised that I wasn’t kick out of that private school but then you realized the effects of your family being one of the founder of this city. However when you met Sally she somehow wasn’t put off by your demeanor. She was the only person who kept you in check during high school. However, her taste in men is trash. She always went after the losers with the big egos who overcompensate with how aggressive they act. You love the girl to death but dear god she needs more growing to do.

"Ah fuck how am I going to find a boyfriend in a week." you pondered. "If I can't find one then maybe I should buy one?... God, I sound spoiled and pathetic, I should go clear my head or some shit.


After you got out of the bed and took a shower, you went to the fridge to grab one of the prepared meals you get delivered every week. You felt like taking McLaren out for a joyride on the strip today. Making your way down the elevator and to the private garage to find you McLaren 600LT sitting there. This car was sex on wheels, and it set you back a pretty penny too. Usually, only douchebags drive luxury sports cars, but this was a hidden pleasure for you. You weren’t much of a car gal but you liked going zoom zoom and that was good enough for you.

You started your baby up and peeled out of the garage heading towards the unused roads.
"Show mama what you can do," you said as you licked your chops.


(3 hours later)

"I swear driving that thing makes me so wet." as you hopped out of your car. "That or it makes you sweaty", but that doesn't matter because your stomach is hungry and you are in the mood for the greasiest shit you can find. And that's why you are heading towards McDoogles.


"I hope they still have those chum shakes."


***Anon

After throwing away most of the clothes, sheets and trash, you would say that you have gotten most of the apartment cleaned up. Besides the mountain of porn sitting in the corner, you deemed this place livable for right now.
"Ugh, I'm starving."
You were so tunneled on cleaning that you forgot to feed yourself. As remembered there was a McDoogles a couple of blocks from here. You threw on a new shirt, grabbed your backpack and went down on the elevator.

As you reached the bottom floor and walked past the front desk, you noticed that the landlord went back to sleep at the front desk.

"He doesn't give a fuck does he?" you thought as you passed him and went out of the door.

It was later in the day, so the sun isn't as intense as it was earlier, which made it bearable for walking. As you were walking, you noticed the people who walked by your change from a mixed bag of anthros walking by into a more shark dense area.

"Oh shit! Did I bring my wallet?" You reached inside of your backpack." oh fuck did I leave it at home."
You opened the bag up some more and stuck your head inside. Then next thing you know you bumped into something that felt hard and meaty, heard a crack and were flat on your ass.

"Owww." you groaned. When you looked up from your daze you saw a huge towering blue-gray anthro shark girl. The girl had to be at least 6’4 or 6’5 compared to your height of 5’9 she was a giant.

She had thick long defined legs that were exposed up to the middle of her thigh. Those shorts were filled out to capacity meaning that they were a snug fit on her big but firm looking ass. Just above her shorts was a pack of firmly defined abs that were exposed below a band t-shirt that was at least a size too small well in the chest area. The shirt was tied up into a knot so her abs must have been the meaty thing you bumped into. You can't imagine the actual bra size of those puppies. Her boobs were at least the size of your head. The most eye-catching thing about her was not her body but those piercing emerald green eyes. It felt like her eyes were looking at my soul and uncovering every secret I had hid away.

"Hello? Mr pervert? You there?" said the mammoth sized shark girl
"W-what? Oh, I'm sorry I bumped into you. I wasn't watching where I was walking." you stammered.
You are hoping this mammoth size of a woman isn't angry. You have a good feeling that she could kick your ass easily.
"Oh, that's no problem."
"Thanks. I'll be on my way then." you reached for your backpack that was on the ground and quickly tried to scurry away.
"Hey! don't you want your porn DVD?" you heard the deep and rich voice call out to you.
You slowly turned around with a puzzled face and said: "What are you talking about?"
She holds up two parts of a broken CD and says with a huge shit-eating smile "Human'd: Jenna Jaws: Uncut and Uncensored. Pretty risque porn to be carrying around in broad daylight huh?"
As soon as you realised what she said you felt like a rock dropped in your stomach, and your mouth became parched.
"Ish not wat is sheems like" you jumbled out of your mouth. Fuck you bit your tongue, and you are sweating like a pig right now. "Tats... Ahem That's not mine, That's my uncle's CD." you managed to spit out.
"Oh. It's your uncles huh." "I would believe ya if it weren't for the way you were oogling me up just now," she said as she moved towards you, her eyes never leaving yours. "I wonder how I should handle this."

You feel her hand rest firmly on your shoulder. She was close enough for you to catch a whiff of her scent. It was a lightly salty scent that you could taste on your lips after you feel your nostrils flare, drinking in her aroma, you caught undertones of lemon and rosemary from her. It must be from the brand of deodorant she is wearing. Do all girls smell this good?

All you could do was stand there looking at her while she put her hand on your body. Your heart was beating rapidly in your chest like a firecracker. The blood in your veins was pumping erratically. Nothing ever in your life made you feel this excited before. You wanted her...no NEEDED her to go farther than this. But before you could open your mouth suddenly, you hear a loud laugh.

"HAHA I'm just fucking with ya dude." she cackled. "It was my fault that I bumped into you and broke your shit."
"uh uh, yea.."you swallowed a mouthful of saliva
"What's your name, my dude?
"My name is Anonymous, but people usually call me Anon."
"Listen how about I make it up to you, Anon. You hungry? How about I'll pay for your lunch?" she said as she pointed to McDoogles "Anything you want and it's on me"
"I couldn't do that. It wasn't that big of a deal really," you squeaked
"Come on. I'm good for it. And besides eating is way more fun with other people" she said as pulled you into the restaurant.

God, she is so strong. I wonder how much she benches. I want to touch her abs. Why is her hand so rough but so smooth at the same time? Does that make sense? Don't you get callouses when you work out? Maybe she uses moisturizing cream? I could see that. God she smells so good. I need to stop smelling her. Fuck just one more time. Am I turning into a degenerate?

Standing behind the counter was a pimply shark youth that looked no older than 17 years old. You saw his eyes light up as he saw Moxy approaching.
"Miss Moxy! Good to see Welcome to McDoogles How may I help you?"
"How's it hanging Sheldon? Give me what I usually get."
"Ok, so that's 2 double doogle burgers, 2 fried fish sandwiches and a large chum shake. Is that all?"

"What do ya want, Anon?"
"Hello? Are you ok dude? I didn't knock something loose did I?" Moxy said with a worried expression.

Jesus Christ Anon! Get yourself together. You are acting like a 15-year-old girl right now. Man up and put on that charming visage that your grandma said you have.

"yea I'm totally alright,"

"cool. So what do you want?” she replied with a questioning look?

You glanced over the menu and decided on the best fast food sandwich on the market. "I'll just take a McThiccen sandwich".

"Just a McThiccen? Are you trying to be nice? I told you I'm good for it.”
"I guess I'll take a meal then?"
"Good. Add 1 McThiccen meal."
"Sure thing would you like that for here or to go?
"We will eat here." she turned her head towards you and said, "You will have lunch with me right Anon?"
"uh yeah sure," you replied
"That will be $45.36."
Moxy handed Sheldon a black card with silver writing. He swiped it through the machine and returned it back to her.
"You are order 162. We will call you when your order is ready. By the way Moxy my brother is really sorry about what happened. He is begging you to give him another chance."

"Tell him to go screw himself. Oh but tell your parents I said hi," she said as walked off to a booth.

Moxy found a booth to sit in and had slide her way in. You noticed that her legs took up most of the room underneath the table. You start wondering how to sit across from her and not make this too awkward.

"You gonna sit down Anon?"
"uh, yea" you squeezed by one of her meaty legs to get one of your legs in the booth and slid your body until you were sitting across from her. We basically had our legs almost touching each others. This was the only day that you were glad that you wore shorts . Her legs felt firm and warm which was a good thing. After being in the air conditioned restaurant, your legs were starting feeling a bit chilly. Trying to take your mind off the feeling of her legs when you brushed by them, you heard her begin to speak.

"So Anon I haven't seen you around town at all. Are you new here?"
"Yea I had some business to handle here and decided that I might as well take a vacation here while I am it."
"I figured so. There's not a lot of humans around here. So it's pretty easy to spot a new face."
"That explains the lack of humans around here huh."
"You need to have an acquired taste to live here. Judging by your taste in porn it must be working out perfectly for you."she said as she leaned forward, her two big mounds pressing against the tabletop
"I-It wasn't mine; it was my uncles" your eyes snapped to her huge boobs and then to her eyes confused about which to look at.
"That one again huh?" ."I don't kink-shame bro. Besides... People who are true to their desires are the most fun to be around." she said with a toothy smile and a half-lidded stare.
"Is that true?"
"Don't you want to find out?" you feel her legs entwined around yours "Have you ever been with a shark girl before ,Anon?"

"N-No. With school and work. I didn't have much time for dating.”
"Oh, that's too bad. Maybe you might get lucky when you are on vacation.You should be careful with your first time though.”
"Why?"
"You might not be able to go back to regular girls after you've felt what a shark girl has to offer," she said as she licked her lips seductively with her long, agile tongue.
God dammit what purpose did God give sharks such long tongues. What in the hell was he thinking?

You swallowed a mouthful of saliva. Before you could respond, you hear someone yell out a number.
"ORDER 162! YOUR FOOD IS READY"
"Tsk. Guess our food is ready" you heard Moxy suck her teeth and felt a gust of hot air caress your face as she angrily flared her nostrils.

You watch her walk to get up and move to get her food. You will gladly take this moment to calm yourself down and collect yourself. Your brain feels like it's going on overdrive. Are all shark girls this aggressive? I can't keep up with her advances. She is coming on to me, right? It's apparent that she wants to fuck at least. But she's totally out of my league, there must be a catch. What if she's part of some human organ harvest gang? Maybe you are taking this out of hand. Perhaps she just thinks you are hot... Nah If that were true, then you wouldn't be stuck at a job working 9 to 5.
You see her approaching with trays of food.
"Here ya go my dude," Moxy said as she placed your tray down on the table.
"Thanks, I owe you one."
"No need I told you this is me paying you back for the porn that I broke."
"If you insist."
"Unless you want to be paid back in a different way," she said foxily “There are some other things I can do that you might like”
"Boy, I haven't had McDoogles in years," you said awkwardly trying to change the subject.
You hear her chuckle as she started to unwrap her burgers. She must be hungry if she got that many burgers. By the way, she's eating sharks clearly have a bigger appetite than humans. And her teeth seem to make quick work of anything that goes into her mouth.

As you take a bite of your sandwich, the taste of chicken mayo childhood filled gushed through your mouth. The McThiccen is truly the best fast food sandwich.

"Ah. This brings back memories"
"What's up?"
"Nothing just reminds me of when I was younger."
"Did ya eat a lot of shit like this when you were a kid?
"Isn't every kid diet when they were younger McDoogles?
"Heh, Mine wasn't."
"What really?"
"Yup Couldn't eat this slop until I was 16. And even then I could only eat it when I snuck out of the house" she said as she popped the rest of the burger in her mouth.
"Were your parents strict type?"
"Eh, you could say that. McDoogles wasn't really in my mind that much when I was a kid anyway," said Moxy. She stopped eating to glare at you for a while.
"Oh. Then you weren't missing much then." you stammered. “After eating this again it wasn’t as good as I remembered.”
A brief moment of silence followed.
"Say... Anon what are you doing later on tonight?”
"uh well, I was supposed to go to a concert tonight.”
"Huh, which one? she said with a puzzled face."
"Um, It's a band called Predator. They are supposed to play down at the Parley. Say since you know the town well could you tell me where that is exactly?
"Hahaha, what a coincidence" she slams her hand down on the table. "I am going to see them tonight with my best friend."
"Woah this is a coincidence huh?"
"Say Anon I have a great idea. How about you come with us to the concert. It will be great."
"N-no I couldn't do that. I don't want to intrude between you and your friends.”
"Don't be like that. We shared lunch, didn't we? We are buddies now."
"Alright, then I guess it can be fun with more people."
"Fuck yeah dude! That's the spirit! I need to go head back to the house to get ready." She moves into her pocket to grab her phone. "Give me your number so we can keep in touch."
You told her your number and watched her happily put it inside of her phone. Heh, the ways she wiggles her tongue between her teeth is so cute. Shark teeth are so weird but the way she does it makes it so cute instead of creepy.
"Sweet Anon. We'll keep in touch Ok?" She grabs her chumshake and leaves the restaurant.
As you watch her swagger her way out the door, you just realized that you just got a date.

"Well...I think I have a date."
"I would watch myself if I were you."
You turn your head to see that shark kid that took your order.
"Excuse me?" you said with a confused face.
"I said I would be careful if I were you. My brother, Billy has his sights on Moxy. And whatever my brother wants he gets."
"How entitled of him to think that way. This Billy guy must be a real lady killer."
"Hey he got her once before, and I'm sure he can do it again. Just trying to let you know bro."

This Billy guy already dated her before? They aren't together anymore, so it's fair game, right?

"It seems to me that she isn't together with this Billy guy anymore. And I'm pretty sure she's old enough to decide on who she wants to date." You stand up from the booth. "Now if you will excuse me I have things to do."

You left the restaurant with a lot on your mind. Is there a hidden reason behind this random encounter? She did come on pretty strong. Could this date end up a mess? It is a bit early to randomly start hanging out with groups of strangers in a city you don’t know. But what did you come here for? Just to play it safe and go back to that shell you put around yourself. I need to do this.


She seemed like a nice girl. I doubt that she would do anything to actually hurt you. And apparently the first girl that I am interested in has an Ex that’s out for blood. How could I ever be so lucky? Will she let you at least touch her abs? She would be open to that right? These are all question you will find out on this “date” tonight.

You checked the time on your phone and realized that it's getting late and you should head home to get ready.

You still have no idea how you are going to get there. What kind of name is The Parley anyway?
Maybe you can call Eric and see if he can give you a ride there.

“God I hope this isn’t a mistake.”

****
When you got back to your apartment, you decided to take a shower since you got a bit sweaty from walking in the heat.
Getting out of the shower, you grabbed your phone and dialed Eric’s number.
Listening to the ringing you finally hear Eric pickup.
“When I gave you my number, I didn’t expect for you to be this clingy.”
“Hilarious,” you said sarcastically
“So what’s so important that got you so excited that made you call me? My time is precious, you know? Did ya come into some money? ”
“No. I need you to give me a ride to The Predator concert. I have a date.”
“A date?? Which poor girl did you threaten into going to that shit show?
“First of all, she asked me out. And secondly, you recommended the fucking concert in the first place.”
“You shouldn’t always listen to what someone tells you, dude. Especially when they tell you to go to a Predator concert.”
“Those are some wise words of wisdom” you sarcastically replied.
“I’m a serious dude.”
“Is it that dangerous? Sharks tend to be pretty chill from what I see.”
“Depends. There are good ones. But a fuck ton of aggressive ones. They are extremely territorial and controlling practically everything they do. Police, bars, clubs, grocery stores, hell even most of the local legislation here are sharks. They practically run the damn city. Sharks are very protective of their own. I suggest you keep your head down while you head out at night.”
“O-oh, really?” swallowing the lump of saliva that is in your throat. “That’s good to know thanks.”
“Wait a minute... Anon. Don’t tell me your date is... Are you fucking crazy dude? Going out with a shark girl in a place filled with disgruntled, crazy and violent shark guys. Are you suicidal or what?”
“The fuck am I supposed to do? She asked me out, and she seemed like a nice girl.”
“Oh lord, it seems like you are going to follow your uncle in the afterlife.”
“Look, can you drive me or not?” you snapped
‘...Sure. Whatever just don’t expect me to save your ass.”
“Thank you.”
“Just text me when you are ready.”
Hanging up the phone, you fall back on the bed.
You never expected to be in this situation. Lying in a dead man’s bed and preparing to go on a date with an anthro shark girl.
Wish grandma was here to give you some advice. She would know what to do.
Checking the time on your phone. “4:56 pm”
You have enough time for a quick nap.
Before you drifting off to sleep, you hear a new text alert on your phone.
“Can’t wait for tonight. :D”
Awh, she uses emojis. You usually find emojis stupid, but it’s cute when she uses them. Should you ask her about the venue.
“Yea about that.”
“Don’t tell me your gonna flake out on me.”
“no no, no it’s not that. just wondering how safe is it for... ya know humans to be there.”
“stop buggin lol. just stick by me and I’ll make sure nothing will happen to ya.”
Aww she used a heart emoji 
“Ok I’ll trust you.”
“good ill, see you tonight?”
“for sure”  you text back.

Fuck all this worrying is tiring you out. 
You feel your eyes get heavier and heavier as you inch closer to sleep land.
****

RING RING

You wake up to the sound of your phone ringing. Checking your phone, you notice that you have two missed calls from Eric. 
Shit, it’s 7:30 you overslept.
You toss on your clothes and grab your wallet and phone. 
After a quick check in the mirror, you decided that you are presentable and head out of your apartment.

On the way down the elevator, you make a call to Eric.
“Anon what’s up dude I’ve been trying to get in touch with you.”
“Sorry I was taking a nap my bad” you apologized
“You’re lucky. I’m such a good person and waited for your ass.”
AS you walk out the lobby door, you see Eric parked out front sitting in the car.
You are getting in the car at an increased pace. You ushered Eric to step on it.
“Hopefully, there’s not a lot of traffic, or else you will be screwed.”
“Just hurry. I’m scared to think about what will happen if I’m late.”
“That shark girl, huh. Is she hot, at least?”
“I-I guess she’s pretty hot.” you muttered shyly. 
“C’ mon dude. If you are putting your life on the line for some pussy, she has to be at least smoking hot.”
“I look at more than just a girls body. Their personality is more important to me.”
“Don’t give me that bullshit” Eric rolls his eyes “Most important thing about your future girlfriend  is your attraction to them.”
“I guess that’s somewhat true.” you agreed
“SO tell me is she an uggo?
“No. She is stunning. She has nice, jade green eyes and a pretty smile. She is athletic and uh her body.. is well endowed, to say the least.”
“She has big milkers, huh?”Eric whistles “I’m more of an ass man myself.”.
You give him a condescending look. “I figured you would like the objectively worse body part of the female.”
“Are you kidding me? You're telling me that those saggy sacks of fat are better than a nice big firm ass?”
“Once you mature, you will come to realize that liking ass is childish.”
“I’m the immature one? Your the one who needs a nipple to suck on!”

AS the two of your discuss the intricacies of ass and tits during the ride to the venue your nervousness of the upcoming date is slowly fading away.

“Listen, Anon. I’m not trying to get in your business or anything, but you should be careful. I don’t want to see you end up on the news.”
“Is it that bad?”
“All I’m saying is that this city loves to chew up poor blokes and spit them out on the nightly basis.  The night scene is brutal, and the sharks running this city doesn’t make it any easier for anyone else to get a foothold.”
“She doesn’t seem like that kind of girl though. She even said that she would protect me if anything goes wrong.”
“Well, there may be some open-minded shark out there, but I can tell you what. A lot of them want to make an example out of people who overstep their bounds,” he warns you
“That sounds fucked.”
“That’s how the sharks stay on top around here.” Eric pulls up to the curb and parks the car. “This city is beautiful and a great place to have fun.” he sighed “You just gotta know when to pick your battles.”
He pulls down the collar of his shirt to reveal a patch of missing fur with a massive scar in the shape of a bite mark.
“Holy, fuck, dude! Did they do that to you?”
“I was a cocky fool who didn’t know the difference between a cat and a mountain lion. I learned that lesson real quick.”
“Fuck, Eric. I don’t know what to say”
“Don’t say anything. Just enjoy your date.” He fixes his shirt and looks at you.”I don’t want you to go in thinking that everyone is scum. I just want you to be careful. There are good cats in this world. This girl could be the love of your life. And I rather have a chunk bitten out of me than regret missing the only chance to meet my girlfriend.”

“Thank Eric. I appreciate this man. I do.”
“No problem, dude. I see a lot of myself in you.” He points towards the bright flashing building up the street.
“The Parley is ahead. You can’t miss it. You’ll know when you see it. I suggest you find your date quick.”
“Ok, thanks, Eric. For everything, man.”
“How about the next time you call me out in the middle of the night you pay me, eh?”
“I’ll think about it,” you said smugly.
“Cheap fucker. Call me if you run into any other trouble. I’ll be sure to send your remains to your next of kin”.
“Good one.” You hopped out of his car and started making your way down the dimly lighted sidewalk.
There was a cool breeze blowing the warm summer air throughout the city. You feel the vibrations from the venue as you approach dark clubhouse.
It’s been a long time I talked to someone like that. Feels nice to make a friend. 
Well, you hope he considers you a friend.
You notice a lot of pierced noses and punkish hairdos moving out and about of the place. 
You pull out your phone and shoot Moxy a quick text to let her know that you are here.
“hey I'm here.”
“where r u?
“at the door.”
“kk coming to get u.”
Before you could message back, you feel your shoulder bump into someone.
“The fuck... Watch where you..”  a tan brown shark turns around and looks at you with a puzzled look. “Is that a human?
“ The fuck is a human doing here?” snapped the other shark
“Sorry about that,”  you said as you backed off. The last thing you need is to start some trouble around here.
“What’s your deal? You lost or something, kid?
“No. I’m just waiting for my date”.
“Weird place to take your date.” said the greased up sand shark.
“I know, right? You sure your date didn’t stand you up? She might be in the bathroom with some shark guy right now having the time of her life.”  laughed the blue shark
You would get angry, but you remember what Eric said in the car.
“Fuck off, dude. I don’t have time for this.” you snapped as tried to move past the duo.
 The tan shark blocked your path. “Hey, pal, where do you think you are running off too? My arm is busted up pretty bad from you running into me.”
“Yea! Are you just going to run off without paying the damages.” said the blue shark.
“What damages?  You look fine.”
“Nah This arm is feeling pretty bad. I need to go to a doctor or something.”
“Dude, you should go get that checked out. But I heard doctors are expensive as fuck.”
“Yea I’m gonna need like 100 bucks for a visit.” the tan shark turns to you. “Since you did cause this thing, you should at least pay for the visit. It’s the right thing to do.”
“100 bucks? No way. It wasn’t even my fault.” The last thing you need is someone trying to extort money out of you.
“Listen human. If you aren’t gonna pay for my hospital bill, then I’m going to put you in one.” The big tan shark moved forward and grabbed your collar. “Got it?”
Fuck just what you need. Was this the type of thing Eric was talking about, wasn’t he? God dammit, what should I do? Maybe I can call Moxy to help straighten this out. 
Wait... If they find out that she’s my date that would make even more problems.
“I-” you began to speak.
“Anon? Is that you?” before you got a chance to respond, you hear a voice behind you call out.
You turn your head to see a tall shark girl walking towards you. “There you are Anon. I finally found you.” She looks over to see the shark guy holding you by your collar.
“Is there a problem here guys?” she asked
The blue shark eyes Moxy up and down. “Not any more baby. Now that you are here, I’m feeling all better.”
You cringe internally from that pickup line. These two shitheads are nothing but trouble. Best to make any more trouble for Moxy.
“Don’t worry about it, Moxy. Just a little misunderstanding.” you break free from the grasp that the tan shark had on your collar.

Turning around, you caught a glimpse of what Moxy was dressed in. A pair of tight light blue denim jeans, black combat boots and a leather jacket with a white t-shirt underneath. She looked pretty badass with that silver linked chain choker around her neck.

“Wow, Moxy, you look great. That jacket is so cool.”
“Ehehe.” she snorts. “This old thing. I had this jacket since high school. It’s a bit snug, but I still wear it from time to time.

You notice that the jacket is slightly small around the chest area. You doubt that she could zip the coat up with all that breast meat packed in that shirt of hers.

“Man look at the body on that one.” says the blue shark.
“You see those tits? Imagine sticking your dick between those babies” cackled the tan shark.

As the two of you were talking, the blue shark made his way in between the two of you. 
“Hey, baby, why are you ignoring us. It seems like you are unsatisfied with that chump over there. Why don’t you dump that loser and come party with us?”  the blue shark said with a toothy smile.

“Anon, do you know these two?”  she said puzzled look on her face.
“No clue.”
“Then let’s go I want to introduce you to my friend.” she grabs your wrist and pulls you past the two guys standing there.

“HEY! Do you think you can treat me like I don’t exist.” the blue shark made a move to grab her arm. 
“Woah there chill out dude” the tan shark stopped him before he grabbed her. “Don’t you know who she is?”
“Wha-  Who gives a fuck?”
“I was wondering where I saw her before, but then it finally hit me. She’s Moxy, Whitlerton.”
“Whitlerton?”
“The family who practically made this city. It’s bad if we try something with their daughter. And besides, I heard Billy is gunning after her, anyways.”
The blue shark sucked his teeth. “Fine didn’t care about that bitch anyway. The snooty girls always think they are too good for people like us anyway.”

“Do you come here often?” you asked as Moxy pulled the two of you away from the sharks.
“I used too. When I was younger, I came here every weekend. Don’t really find this place fun anymore, though.”
“Oh well. This place does have a ‘unique’ charm to it.” you nervously said, looking at the strange pirate decor adorning the walls. “You must have been one of the cool kids in school, huh?”
“Nah I was a little shithead. I hated people and people hated me. No one really liked me unless they were trying to get in my pants or get to my parents.
You sensed an air of melancholy around her when she told you about her past.
“I didn’t have that many friends either during high school. I didn’t let that keep me down either. Besides I think you are a pretty cool friend anyways.” you said with a smile.
“Hehe. You are pretty cheesy, you know that?” she giggled.
“Can’t help it if it’s true.”
“C’ mon let me introduce you to Sandy.”


Making your way through the hordes of drunken patrons you see a group of sharks standing at a table: two guys sharks and a female one.

As you made your way to the table you see the female shark run up towards Moxy. By a logical guess you can confirm that this person is Sandy.

 Sandy is a Grey shark (cow shark) with freckles sprinkling her face and shoulders that are revealed by the red shirt she is wearing. She has her brown hair done into a braid of some sort that is at least shoulder length. Sandy has a some kind of a lithe frame for a shark. Not too skinny and not too fat. And a B-cup chest and long thin legs which was weird because she was noticeably shorter than other sharks. You think she is at least two inches shorter than me.

She was kinda cute when standing next to the tall Moxy. It kinda looks like Moxy is her mother. Hmmm. Maybe, big sister, little sister dynamic might be better? Besides the fact that Moxy has no hair and no freckles and is a different colour. Alright, they don’t look anything alike, But you wonder how such a tiny girl became friends with one of the biggest girls you’ve seen.

“Moxy, Where have you been?” Sandy leans in and whispers “ Meathead over there is getting pretty paranoid.”

 The freckled shark turns her head, and her eyes meet yours. “Is this...Anon?” Sandy starts mashing Moxy’s boobs together angrily.
“You stupid dummy. Did all of your brains go straight to your tits? Why did you bring this fellow here, knowing how Billy will respond?” 
“Who cares what he thinks? You said all I have to do is show up.so what does it matter to him if I bring a date?” “Besides...”  Moxy leans down to whisper in her ear. “I think I like this guy though Sandy.”
“Then you shouldn’t make your first date in this shitty bar with a bunch of rowdy drunken sharks around.”
“Shit you might be right. I’m not good at these things you know that” she said as she scratched the back of her head.
“Listen.” Sandy sighed. “You know how territorial sharks are with their mates. You are bringing another guy here and on top of that, a human no less is already sending Meathead over there red flags. I suggest you keep an eye on Anon. If you care as much as you say you do about Anon, you should do everything you can to keep him safe.”
“You don’t think that Billy would do something, would you?”
“I wouldn’t put it past him and his goons. Word around town he is already hooking up with you. So you are basically off limits. Just keep an eye out, ok?”
“Will do.” Moxy nods in agreement
Sandy slaps her tits one last time.”These bags of fat is going to get someone killed one day.”

She walks over towards you and extends her hand. “Hey there, Anon. My name’s Sandy. I’m that idiot girl over there best friend.”
You stretch your hand out to meet hers with a shake.
“Nice to meet you, Sandy,” you say with a smile.
“Likewise. We are just gonna chill here for tonight, nothing too extreme.”
“Oh I’m cool with that.” you notice the bigger buff shark glaring at you from the table. “Who is that? And why is he looking at me like I killed his dog?”
“O-Oh that’s just Billy. He’s just a mutual friend we decided to invite. He’s real uh irritable around humans. The best thing for you to do is to ignore him.”
“Uh, sure, I guess I can do that if it helps him feel more comfortable.”
It’s going to be pretty hard ignoring a 6’2 buff as fuck shark dude with the slicked back Fonzie hair and a huge scar running down his arm giving you the death glare all night. But you think you could try for Moxy though.

As you approach the standing table, you see the look on Billy’s face soften.
“Moxy you’re back! Where ya been baby?” Billy’s eye shifts to you. “ Whose the human?” he asks.
“Don’t call me that,” she said with a disgusted snarl. “And it doesn’t matter who he is; it has nothing to do with you.”
“Woah Woah Woah, Why so hostile? I was just wondering,” he said with a slack-jawed smile. “Let me apologize. I’ll buy you a drink. You still drink those uhhh Mojitos right? Without the lime?” 
“Whatever.”
“Great. I’ll be right back.”
You watch him swagger off in the direction of what you guess where the bar is located.
“What was that about?” you asked.
“It’s nothing important really.” she turns her head towards you. “Anyways, have you been enjoying the city so far?”
“From what I’ve seen so far yea. I’ve heard of some places to that sound cool, but I don’t know how to get there.”
“I could show you around if you want. I know a killer swimming spot.”
“I would have to learn how to swim first,” you said sheepishly. Growing up in a disadvantaged situation didn’t give you exactly the time for you to learn how to swim.
“ That’s no biggie. I can teach you if you want.”
“I would love that. I’m a bit of a slow learner and never really was athletic, so please take care of me,” you said laughed.
“Hmph. I’ll take good care ofyou. I’ll have you in shape in no time.” she said, rubbing on your back.
“Yuck, you two should get a room already,” Sandy said while pretending to barf.
“Shut-it chestlet.”
“My boobs are an average size for a girl my age! You are the one with the abnormal chest!” Sandy snapped back

“Anyways Anon what do you do for a living?” she said as she ignored Sandy’s tantrum
“Oh, I just finished my degree in Computer science.”
“Do you like stuff like that? Computers and shit?”
“Not particularly. It was something that paid well that and didn’t want to make me go jump off a bridge.”
“That’s life huh?” she grinned
“Yup”
Guess everyone shares the same sentiment about life. One of the sad realities we realize when we grow up. The two of you go on about to talk about life and other stupid shit.

“I wen-”
“Here you go~! Once Mojito for the sexy lady.” Billy said as he interrupted you and placed the drink down in front of Moxy. “Drink up my little sugar shark.”
You see her glare at Billy.
“Hey, Anon are you thirsty?” she asked
“Yea I gue-”
She slams the drink down if front of you.
“Drink up. I used to drink these babies all the time.”
“Oh, I don’t want to be rude and take your drink.”
“Don’t worry about it. I’m driving tonight anyway. I want to make sure you get home safe so have fun.”
“If you insist.” You take a good drink of the beverage. You weren’t much of a drinker back in college. But this tastes good. The mint works well with this liquor. It has this weird aftertaste, though. Is this type rum favorite around here?
“Wait, that’s not for you” Billy interrupted. “Fuck..”
“Wow, this is good. Thanks, Moxy” you thank her.
“No problem,” she says with a smile.

 The group at the table carried on with different conversations. As time went on, you finished the drink to avoid seeming picky. You felt your body heating up and a little dizzy. You didn’t think you could handle your liquor this badly. You needed to go to the bathroom to freshen yourself up.
“Do you feel alright, Anon?” asked Sandy.
“HA. The pussy can’t even handle a little bit of alcohol.”
“Fuck off Billy” snapped Moxy
You couldn’t even take the time to care about what that shark said. Everything started to look like it was blurring together. Maybe you needed to splash some water on your face to freshen up.
“Uh guys, do you know where the bathroom is?” you slurred.
“Yea it’s down that hallway and to the left.”

You stumble off to the bathroom, hoping to get wake yourself up.

Turning the corner, you lean against the wall to see two doors come into your sight.  Squinting to read the sign, you confirm that the one on the left is the male bathroom.

Pushing open the door, you walk into the bathroom.
Ah what good luck. You are the only one in here.
 It’s not as dirty as you thought for a bar bathroom. 
Spotting the sink you move to stand in front of the mirror.
 My god, you look horrible. 
Your eyes are all droopy, and you're sweating a lot.
 Every part of your body feels on fire but strangely pleasant at the same time.

Turning on the cold water, you splash some water on your face and drink some of it. 
You feel your body jolt awake from the freezing cold water.
 You are looking up from the sink you see that you became a bit better from the chilling liquid.
 For some reason you can’t get the thought of Moxy’s boobs out of your mind. You can’t help but look at the way the move every time she laughs. Why am I so horny tonight?
“What kind of rum do they put in that drink,” you said to yourself.
You hear the sound of boots walking towards the door. Guess moments of peace only last a while.
The door opens, and you go to see what dude decided to interrupt your boobie time.

***Billy Stanton POV

Did she forget who I am? I’m Billy fucking Stanton.
The star slugger for the local baseball league, lady killer and was voted the hottest guy in high school in the yearbook.
And you can’t believe what this bitch Moxy did to you.
You tried to be friendly and invite her out for a good time but she refused to respond, and you have to go through other means to get her out here.
Upon that she barely talked to you when you got here. And worst of all she decided to bring a fucking human here. Is she trying to get back at me or something? She must have worse daddy issues than you thought. Luckily for her that her daddy runs this city. Look at her, laughing and touching him. 
Embarrassing. Her acting is so weak. Snapping at me like that. What is she trying to prove?
HA I know she needs a few drinks in her system to get her going.
“Let me apologize. I’ll buy you a drink. You still drink those uhhh Mojitos right? Without the lime?”
Great! guess she can’t break old habits huh. I have something that will loosen her right up. She will be all over you like barnacles on a ship.

You make your way over to the bar.
“YO SIMON!” you yell over the loud crowd near the bar.
“AYYY BILLY HOW’S IT HANGING?”
“I need a Mojito without the lime. And make it a double fizzy if you know what I mean.”
“You need an EXTRA good time, huh? No problemo brother. This drink will have you flying in heaven in no time.”
Standing at the bar waiting for your you noticed a purple haired shark girl checking you out. 
She blows you a kiss at you as soon as the two of you make eye contact. You give her the famous Stanton smile.
She begins walking over to you.
Yup. Works every time. Bitches always fall for the smile.
“Aren’t you Billy Stanton?  What is a big shot like you doing here all by himself~” she purred.
“No, I’m here with my friends.”
“Aww, That’s too bad. I thought maybe we could have some fun~” The girl started to rub your glorious pecs in an alluring way.
“Tell you what. Give me your number, and we can have some once I’m free. How does that sound?”
“Sounds good to me, stud.” she cooed.
Giving her your number, you see her walk off into the crowd.
 Might as well try to have some fun before I get married. Word on the grapevine is that Moxy’s parents are pressuring her into settling down. This is the best piece of news that weirdo fuck Ermon (Sandy’s current date) ever gave you. 
Guess that loser’s pee fetish finally paid off. Can’t imagine getting off to the sound of a girl’s pissing. 
What a creep.
Anyhow you are the perfect choice for Moxy to bring home to marry. 
Our parent’s know each other, we had a relationship before, and I have good job prospects. This is a pie falling from the sky for you.
She’s rich, got a smoking body besides her being bald, and I can have a backing in the city to do whatever the fuck I want.
The only problem is that bitch’s attitude towards me. She was way more easy to control in high school.
She’ll learn who her Daddy is sooner or later.
“HERE YA GO MY MAN,” Simon says as he slams the drink down on the counter. “Careful with that drink, my friend. That drink will have the person riding on cloud nine.”
“Thanks, Simon.” You slide him a 50 dollar bill.
You grab the drink and make your was back to the table.
Here you go~! Once Mojito for the sexy lady.” you said as you placed the drink down in front of Moxy. “Drink up my little sugar shark.”
Heh, wait until she gets that in her system. 
She’s going to be on you like newborn chick.
“Hey, Anon, are you thirsty?”
“Wait, that’s not for you” Billy interrupted.
Moxy, you bitch. It can’t be that she knows that the drink is spiked. Otherwise, she wouldn’t have given it to that human. 
Unless... She’s more ruthless than you think. 
 “Fuck..”
You are gonna have to rethink how you are going to get Moxy to realize I’m her only option.
That kid is feeling the effect alright. I went for a straight shot of e because Moxy is a bit bigger.
It shouldn’t kill him. I think...
I need to play this off. To clear the bases just in case, he ends up Overdosing or something.
“HA the pussy can’t even handle a little bit of alcohol.”
“Fuck off, Billy” snapped Moxy
Tsk. Looks like the kid is going to the bathroom. Maybe this is a chance for me to scare him off. Gonna be hard to do if he’s doped up.
You send a message to one of your boys to help you make your message more ...reasonable to the human.
Looking up from your phone you noticed Moxy is gone too.
Good. She can’t blame this on me if she doesn’t see me leave.
“Imma goes out for a smoke,” you say to the other two at the table.


***

“Moxy, why are you interrupting my boobie time?”
“Boobie what? What are you talking about Anon? Hold on a sec.”
She walks over to put her hands on your face. Ohhh her hands are cold. Does she think I’m a hand warmer? 
“I’m not a hand warmer you silly shark” you say drunkenly. “But that feelsh really good. Keep doing it”
“Dammit he really did drug that drink. This is my fault Anon. I gave you that drink assuming that he wouldn’t do anything like this.”  she sighed “I never thought he would stoop this low. ”
She looks so sad. I hate seeing people sad. People do stupid stuff when they are depressed.
“Why are you sad? Give me a hug. Grandma said that hugs make everyone feel happy.”
You move in to give her a hug. Even though she is at least a head taller than you, the best part is that your head is the about the same height as her boobs.
“Fine, I’ll humour you.” She presses your head on her chest. “You are lucky. I think you are cute.”
Your face is met with two large orbs of softness. You start taking deep breaths of her scent. God she smells like that lemon deodorant she wore earlier today. 
Yup. This is the secret to happiness.  
“Why do you keep sniffing me? Are you part dog or something?”
 Raising your head up from her cleavage “No, I just like how you smell.”
“W-What are you talking about? Do I stink or something?” she lifts her arm up to smell herself. “I don’t have any perfume on or anything.”
You wrap your arms around her hourglass figure. “No. You just smell good. Like lemons and salt.”
“Gee. Thanks...I guess?”
Touching her feels so good. You start to inching your hands lower and lower until you reach her ass.
You hesitate for a second before you started to squeeze her ass. 
Her ass was soft yet firm. It’s like the fat in her body was moulded perfectly across her body. It makes sense that these enormous thighs of hers support this ginormous ass of hers.
“Feeling a bit handsy, huh? I’m guessing you are liking what you are touching?”
After finally realizing what you are doing, you remove your hands quickly as possible. “Ah, I’m sorry about that. I should have asked  you first,” you said apologetically.
What are you doing, Anon? Feeling up a girl, you just met inside of a bar’s restroom? Your grandma taught you better than that.
“I don’t mind. But... I would prefer to do this in a place more uh. romantic”
“That was my fault. That drink has got me feeling a bit crazy.”
“I don’t blam-” you see her head snap towards the door. “Someone is coming.”
She grabs your hand and pulls the both of you into a stall and slams the door shut. She pins you on the stall wall and covers your mouth. Moxy held up a finger in front of her mouth to tell you to be quiet.

You hear the door slam open. And a bunch of footsteps walk through the door.
“YO HUMAN YOU IN HERE?” a deep voice called out.
“Keep it down fuck face. Do you want to let everyone know what we are doing?” said a  raspy dry voice.
 “Boss wants him roughed up a bit. Who cares if people find out. Besides, no one sticks their neck out for a human anyway.”
“Poor kid. He’s unlucky for pissing off Billy.”
“What did he even do?”
“I heard he was getting all cosy with Boss’s girl.”
“Which one? I lost track after Sandra.”
“The Whitlerton girl. Big tits, big ass, big green eyes and bald up top.”
“That muscle chick?”
“Yea, that’s the one.”
“Really her? She’s more of a one-night stand type of girl. Plus she’s way too mannish to marry anyway. It would probably feel like getting married to another dude or something.” the raspy voice cackled.
What pieces of shit. Moxy is plenty feminine. You think she would make a great wife.
 You turn your head to look at Moxy. 
Her face showed no emotion, but she has a sad and sullen look in her eyes. 
“And the human wants to fuck that thing? Dam those scrawny bastards would stick their dick in anything huh.” said the deep voice
“Billy just wants the Whitlerton family money and power. What a gold digging little bitch. I’m jealous.” said the raspy voice enviously.
“Don’t let him hear you say that.”
You hear them kick open the stalls next to the one the two of you are in.
“He’s not even in here.”
“Guess he left.”
The footsteps reached to stop right in front of your stall door.
Moxy braces herself to get a surprise hit on the guy that’s about to open your door.
Before she gets ready to strike. A group of guys came inside the bathroom, laughing and joking.
“And then her shirt got ripped off. Hahaha.”  said a voice
“Did she let you look?” said another one.
“Duh, idiot.”
Thank god for drunk people.
“Come on, let’s go. Just gotta tell Boss he wasn’t in here” you hear the deep voice say.
The two of you wait out the traffic of people that came into the bathroom.
After the last person left the bathroom. Moxy came to you, rested her head on yours and embraced you in a hug.
“You wouldn’t do that to me right Anon?  You actually like me, right?” she says with a shaky voice “Lie to me at least. But please don’t say no. I don’t know what I would do if you said no right now.”

Wow... She must be really shaken up from this. I should let her finish before I respond.

“I-I was really looking forward to this you know? It was the first time in a long time that I was excited about a date.” you hear her sniffle.
“When I was younger I was made fun of for being bigger than most girls and being bald. I tried so hard to become like other girls. Painted my nails, wore cute dresses, I even started to talk differently so that people can recognize that I am a girl. One day someone told me to stop acting like this. Said it was like “a guy trying to act like a girl” They gave me the nickname Moxy the man because of this”. 
She squeezed your body hard.
“I was so mad. So angry that I didn’t know what to do. I wasn’t mad at the kids who made fun of me, the weird looks people gave me when I walked by or even my parents who raised me. I was mad at myself.”
Why would she be mad at herself? It’s not her fault that the kids were dicks.
“I blamed myself for being born this way. I never asked to be tall or to be bald. I wanted to go out on dates and have fun like everyone else. I hated myself. It had gotten to the point where I started to believe that I was a disgusting beast myself. That all I was good for was my family’s power or riches.”
Moxy wipes her eyes.
“I gave up looking for someone who could love me for me. My parents worry so much about me. They know that I’m lonely, but they can’t use money or power to fill this gap that’s in my heart.”

She stares at you with those big pretty green eyes.
“Until I met you. Even though it was for a short while I could tell you were the same as me. I could see that look in your eye. That same crippling loneliness and despair bottled up inside of you. I felt it when you looked at me. That call for help that no one else but I can hear. Call me crazy if you want, but I feel it...deep in my bones that we were meant for each other.”

She laughed with a melancholic tone.
“Did you think I was a slutty girl when you first met me? I was so forward to you because I didn’t want to lose you. Haha, I was so determined not to lose my last chance at love I had to push myself on you.  Tell me, Anon. Please tell me that my gut wasn’t wrong. I thought I could avoid scaring you off with my problems but before we continue any of this I want to know how you feel about me.”

Fuck this was a lot to take in at once. Guess being rich doesn’t solve all your problems
Never knew how hard she struggled with her identity.
You guess bullying would fuck anyone in the ass while growing up
More importantly, how did she know that you were lonely?
Is it that readable on my face? 
I mean she is right, but you don’t want people to know that I’m some gloomy person.
How should you deal with this? You don’t want to give her the idea that I’m not saying what she want’s to hear.
You wish people were able to understand you just like Grandma used to do.
Feelings are too complicated. Being on drugs doesn’t make this easier. Or does it?

“Listen, Moxy, I..” You stop to think for a while about what you are going to say.
Fuck that’s too blunt
“Moxy, when I...”
“I knew it. Stupid stupid stupid. I was too naive to skip so many steps. I’ll just leave. Sorry for pushing all of this on you so suddenly.” She rushes out of the stall in a hurry, tears streaming down her face.

“Dammit, Moxy wait. Let me finish.” you chase after her and grab her meaty arm.
Spinning her around, you gently wipe the tears falling from those big eyes of hers.
“I was never good with telling others how I feel. Growing up, I felt like expressing yourself was a weakness. I could never trust anyone with how I truly felt. It was like letting someone know what makes you tick and gives them the power to break you down at their will.” you sighed.

“I used to be a crybaby when I was a kid. My mother hated it. She constantly told me to keep quiet and act like a man. “Real men don’t cry,” she says. Father wasn’t around much, between work and the trips to the bars he wasn’t able to spend much time with you. I used to think that he worked really hard to provide for my mother and I. Turns out he was having affairs on the side. Once Mother found out about his cheating, she was livid. She yelled and cried, blaming herself for being so undesirable. She begged him to stay. I never understood why she was begging the man who hurt her so badly to stay around. After he left, she was a broken woman. She began to blame things around her. Her decisions, her family, even I became the reason she was alone. I was the reason why the man that she loved so much left her for another woman. I was the reason why the home was broken. I remember the last thing she said to me before she left me. It was stuck with me because it was the week before my birthday.  I was a kid at the time, so I couldn’t help but be excited even though we were in tough times. I asked her what I was going to get for my birthday. She looked at me with those haggard disgusted eyes and said to me“I wish you weren’t born. All you do is fucking cry. I knew I should have aborted you. Shame on me for trying to please Mom.” I wouldn’t even be alive without Grandma protecting me in my Mother’s stomach.

You swallow the lump in your throat.
“The next day she was gone. No note, no message, not even a picture to let their child to know what happened to her. Both my father and mother were gone and left without their child. I was alone. The only good thing that came out of the situation was meeting Grandma. She taught me everything about the world that I couldn’t understand. She was the only family I had left. Grandma gave up her everything for me.  As I grew older, I realized that I couldn’t do things that other kids can do with their parents. Like go to basketball games or participate in any clubs after school. I was scared. I was scared of asking too much from the person I care about the most. I was scared that eventually that even she might leave me too because I was asking for too much. I never told her this, but she already knew how I felt. That was one thing I loved about grandma. She never made me say anything that I had trouble saying. She could know what I was thinking just by looking at my face.”

Feeling a smile form on your face, you continued.

“When she died, I was lost. I lost my best friend, parent, and therapist all at the same time. I knew it wasn’t my fault that she died. But I still thought about if I hadn’t cried so much. If I hadn’t caused my father and mother to leave. If I hadn’t caused my grandma to come out of retirement to work herself to death. If I hadn’t been born so that I couldn’t cause so much harm to the people around me that I loved, I think all of these feelings are a weakness that causes me to hurt myself and others around me. Just like you I sealed myself up to avoid trusting another person with this weakness I have. 

You move her arm to expose her hand in front of you.
“When I first saw you fireworks went off in my brain. Some force was drawing me towards you. I can’t be sure if that was a good or bad thing. I never felt this way before.” Matching up your hand to hers, you entwine your fingers with hers.
“If you are willing to be so honest and open with me. I am willing to give you all of me in return,” you said with a smile. 
Fuck that kinda sounded like wedding vows. 
“Does that mean?”
“Yes. I like you because you are you. Just promise me not to throw me away.”
“I promise!” she grabs you into a big bear hug. Ah fuck these drugs make hugs feel like masturbation. 
“I knew you felt the same way about me,” said Moxy
You see a blush creep on her face. “What’s wrong?” you said.
“Well...Are you comfortable with a kiss? To ya know...celebrate the occasion.”
“I’m fine with anything as long you aren’t trying to kill me.”
“Oh ok That’s great to know” she grinned
“I never kissed anyone before though”
“That’s ok. We can learn from each other.” leaning down, she grabs your shoulders before going in for a kiss.
You oblige and try to meet her halfway. As she got closer, you feel the heat from her nostrils blow across your face. The first feeling you felt when your lips touched was softness. Slowly you awkwardly pushed your lips forward in a pucker motion like you see in the movies. Then you quickly pull back with a smack from her trying to suck your bottom lip. 
That felt strangely good. It’s weird how just rubbing lips together can be so pleasurable.
“Mmm... Needs some work. Let’s try again.” she said with an intoxicated look.
“uh sure.”
She leans down once again, and the two of your lips meet.
This kiss was a bit slower than the last one. You feel her mouth part to introduce something new to the equation.
Her tongue was licking at the entrance to your mouth like it was asking to come inside.
Obliging her request, you feel a long wet tongue slide into your mouth slowly but firmly.
Meeting her tongue inside your mouth, the two of you begin to dance orally.  It is evident that her tongue would dominate yours. Her tongue was longer and more narrow compared to your short, broad tongue. As the two of you were mashing your taste buds together, you feel her arms sink lower until they reached your ass with a firm squeeze. That feeling evoked a small shock from you, which made you lose the ongoing tongue war.
 You decided two can play at that game.
 Reach down from her back, you reach for those two plump ass cheeks of hers and begin to play with them.
You tried kneading, rubbing and even an occasional slap. It seemed like she could handle everything you threw at her.
She started to moan into your mouth. “Mhmmmm”
It had gotten to the point where we were drinking each other’s sweet saliva. Sucking on her tongue as if it were a straw to get every drop out of her mouth. 
She seems to enjoy having her tongue sucked on. By the way that she's opening her mouth for you to suck on her organ easier. 
Maybe she likes getting her body groped. 
You should make a mental note to test later.
AS much as you didn’t want it to end your mouth was getting tired. 
You move your mouth in closer with hers to form one last kiss before you pull away with favour loud SMACK.

The two of you stand there with dazed and tired expressions.
“We..should do that...more,” she says out of breath.
“Yea...” you agreed. “Never thought my first kiss would be in a public toilet, though.”
“Oh shit, we should get out of here. Before those goons come back.” she looks at you with a gaze filled with expectation. “Do you want to come back to my place? I...dodon't feel like being alone tonight.”
That’s a serious look she’s giving you. It’s hard to say no when she looks at you like that.
“Sure I’ll come with you,” you say with a smile.

She grabs your hand, and the two of you make your way to leave the bathroom.
On the way back to the table you notice Moxy is a bit more cheerful than she was before.
You see, Sandy run up to Moxy hurriedly.“Moxy! I think Billy is up to something. He’s been looking at his phone all night. Huh?” she looks between the two of you “ Did something good happen? Don’t tell me...In the bathroom... really??”
Moxy pets the top of Sandy’s head “Stop overreacting midget. Nothing like that happened.”
“Stop jerking me around. I know that look anywhere. Something went down in that bathroom.  And I want to know!”
“I’ll tell you later if I feel like it,” she said smugly.
“Don’t act smug with me you fat cow.”
“Listen, I am going to head back to the apartment. Can you catch a ride?”
“So soon?” she notices that the two of you are still holding hands. “Oh. I get it now. You two are going back to finish the deed, huh? Leave a little old me here by herself.”
“Don’t be like that, Sandy. We are just feeling a bit tired; that’s all.”
“Tired my ass. I can smell lies, you big oaf. You are probably going home to get dicked down by Anon over here. I hope he pokes you right in your cervix. Dumb cunt.”
You see Moxy’s cheeks turn a shade of pink.
“S-Shut up. We aren’t even going to do anything like that!” she yelled
I don’t know about that. Sex does sound kinda fun. She would be open to having sex with you, right?

“Yes, you are. You want to know why? Because you are a penis monster. All you think and talk about is penis all day.” “’ Hey, Sandy you sucked a penis before what does it smell like? Does it taste good? Don’t you think human penises look better than those stupid spiky ones?’” she said in a mocking tone.

“W-What a-are you saying?!” she stuttered, “I-I told you that in secret!”
“You keep spamming my DMs with tons of pictures of dicks. ‘God. I just need one penis to suck. If I had a boyfriend, I would let him fuck me all day.’ You’re so annoying, penis monster.” Sandy taunted
“Stop calling me penis monster!” she said embarrassingly.
“Penis Monster. Penis Monster. Penis Monster. Thank god we have such a brave hero to slay this Penis Monster with his penis. I am saved from this annoying creature.” she turns to you and gives you a military salute. “Thank you, Sir Anon, for your valiant effort.”

You started to chuckle.
“Anon, why are you laughing? You are supposed to be on my side.” she pouted.
“I think this is pretty adorable. I’m surprised she can tease you so well.”
“I’m just joshing you cow tits. Go ahead and have fun. Just make sure to wrap it up before you stick it in. Or not. I don’t really care.”
“Thanks...” Moxy mumbled.
“Just remember that you owe me one. Stay safe, you two.” she waved.
“You too.”
“The two of you are close, huh?” you said as the two of you walked towards the exit.
“Yea, she’s like a sister to me.”
Sister huh. That sounds pretty nice.
I wonder what would happen if I had siblings.

The light seas breeze blows across your face as the two of you manage to squeeze out of the door.
“C’ mon I parked this way.” she grabbed your hand and pulled you down the street.
As the two of you walked, you noticed that Billy guy standing under the light pole, smoking a cigarette.
Moxy took the approach to act like he wasn’t there and tried to move by him.
“Moxy? What are you doing out here?”
She continues to pull your hand to walk by him.
“Oh, you are holding hands now? How cute. Do you really think these simple games can make me mad baby?”
Moxy doesn’t even acknowledge him talking to her.
“Hey! Talk to me!” He tries to grab her arm to stop her from walking away.
In the blink of an eye, Moxy turns around and sucker punch Billy right in the face. Billy crumbles down on the ground like a piece of paper.
Holy shit.
“Holy shit,” you say.
“Next time you pull this shit again. I WILL erase you from this city. I’m done with you. Go fuck with all those other girls you like so damn much.”
Damn, she must have knocked his ass out. Guess he wasn’t expecting that cuz he ain’t getting up
She grabs your hand and breaks into a jog.

Running down the parking lot.The two of you stop in front of some sort of fancy sports car.
“Woah. Is this your ride?” you admired while out of breath.
“Yup. Now get in. I don’t want him following us.”
You hop inside of the expensive looking car. The seats feel so...premium. Is that a feeling? 
Must be made out of some sort of sweat resistant leather or something.
She ignites the car to life and whips out of the parking lot.
The car speeds up once it reaches the main road. You buckled your seat belt out of reaction to the speeds you see her reach.
You don’t know if it’s her driving or the drugs making you anxious.
“Oh, sorry about that.”She begins to slow the car down to a much more manageable speed. “I’m not used to driving with another person.
“It’s fine.” you sighed, getting your nerves together. “Are you really into cars or something??”
“Not really. I just like the excitement I get from driving fast. That and this car looks awesome.”
So she’s one of those adrenaline junkies or something? 
“It’s not like I’m addicted or anything like that. It’s just a hobby that takes my mind of the problems I have.”
An expensive one by the looks of it.
“If you have anything you want to talk about. I’m right here.” you reminded her
“Yea. I know. Thanks” she grumbled.
You can tell she is upset about something.
“So, uh.  About what happened back there.”
She abruptly stops the car to a halt at a red light.
“Don’t want to talk about it,” she said firmly
“Oh ok ok,” you said, followed by an awkward silence.
You hear the sound of her gripping the steering wheel.
“Look, I’m not usually violent like I was back there. I was just pent up from all the stress he’s put me through.”
She releases a big sigh. “I’m just not ready to talk about my past relationships yet. Trust me you will be the first person I’ll tell.”
“It’s ok, I understand. Take your time.” You didn’t want to push her on anything unless it’s for a good reason.

As you two got closer to the heart of the city, the buildings got bigger and better. Tons of flashing lights and bustling people filled the sidewalks. You could imagine how profitable to start a business in this area. This place has way more dense traffic than in your old town.

It kinda makes you feel small.
It’s even prettier at night, huh?” Moxy says to you as she saw you looking out the window.
“Hard to imagine that this place was once a ghost town.”
“Sometimes things that are abandoned, with enough love and care can become amazing later on.”
You let your brain sit and think about that last statement.
What did she really mean by that? Is she talking about the city? Herself? Or me?

Lost in the thought, you realize that the car is stopped and you two of you are in some sort of private parking garage.
“Come on. let’s head up.”
The two of you got out of the car and left the garage. You are suddenly met with a tall skyscraper that looks like it’s made out of glass. 
Man, skyscrapers are even more intimidating up close.
Regal apartments, huh.
The name sounds cool enough.
You follow Moxy to the door of the building.
“Welcome back, Miss Whitlerton.” says a gruff looking tiger man in a white and black suit as he held the door open for her.
Quickly running up beside her, you whispered to her “Is he a doorman or something?”
“Yes?” she said with a puzzled expression.
“They still exist? I thought they only existed in movies?”
“Well, he is also part of the security for this building too. But yea, you can technically call him a doorman.”
Guess you never actually been to such a ritzy place before. 
I guess there is a distinct shift of cultures depending on how much money you have.
I see Moxy go into a special elevator that is slimmer with a gold trim compared to the other lifts.
 Getting in the elevator, you see the control panel for the elevator.
There are only like 4 buttons on here.
“Why are there so little buttons? I’m pretty sure this place has more than 4 floors.”
“This is a private elevator for the place that I’m staying in.” she scans her card on an electronic reader and points to the panel. “Press the PH button for me.”
You see the PH button and press it. 
“What does PH mean?.”
“It means Penthouse.”
“Oh so this whole elevator is just for you?!” you exclaimed
“It normal for penthouses to have dedicated elevators. I wouldn’t want anybody to access to my floor so easily.”
“Wouldn’t that be crazy expensive?”
“Not really. Dad knows the building owner, so I get to live up here for free. Besides, it saves time when the elevators get busy.”
That must’ve been a big favor. 
The elevator dinged, indicating that it reached the top floor.
Greeting you as the two of you get off the elevator is a chic black door with a big golden ‘W’ in the middle of it.
She unlocks the door with her keys and ushers you inside.
“Home, sweet home. Just toss your shoes wherever you want.”
You are stepping over the threshold you take your shoes off at the door.
Following behind Moxy, you actually realize this place is enormous.
“You want some water?”
“Yes, please.”
While you see her head off into what you assume to be the kitchen you take the time to check the place out.
Black marble flooring, intricate indoor balconies, and dazzling crystal chandlers ,this place is fucking swank.
Walking further into the apartment you notice how the living room is designed.
“Holy shit...”
One of the walls of the apartment is entirely glass. You can see a complete view of the city from here.
It’s enormous... you wish you had taken that photography class in college. This is a perfect time for a picture.
“Pretty cool huh?” she said
Moxy hands you a bottle of cold water.
“Yea, it’s awesome. Normally I have a fear of heights, but right now it’s not that bad,” you said, taking a swig of the cold liquid. “Must be the drugs or something.”
“How are you feeling? Do you want to lie down?” she said worriedly.

You do feel a bit tired. Moving all that shit around and cleaning out your dead uncles apartment took a lot out of you.
Maybe you can lay down just a bit.
“If it’s not too much trouble.”
“Come with me.”
Moving across the loft you feel the cool black marble underneath of your feet. Following her further back into the apartment you notice you have arrived at a bedroom.
When she opened the door, a familiar gust of lemon tickles your nose.
Is this her room? Why would she bring me here?
Your question is answered after identifying some bras and panties on the chair in the corner.
She walks over to the King sized bed and straightens out the cover before gesturing you to lay on it.
“Is this ok? This is your bed, right?”
“I brought you here myself, didn’t I? It’s better than leaving you in some spare bedroom all the way across the apartment.” she pats the spot she cleaned. “Besides I can keep an eye on you from here.”
No point in arguing with the queen, you guess.
Plopping yourself down on the bed, you immediately notice a tingling sensation on your body. 
“Ahh...” you moaned.
The drugs must still be in effect. Because this bed is the softest thing, you felt in your entire life.
“Are you ok?” she asked worriedly
“Yea it’s just that this bed is so soft. I never felt anything like this before.”
“Oh, yea it’s one of those tempur-something beds. It feels alright.” she sits on the bed beside you.
Moxy started to study you face intensely.
She reached her hand out to your face to check it’s temperature. AS soon as she touched you the same tingling feeling come back.
“Mmmm” your body reacting with a shudder.
This is bad. Why are you doing weird stuff like this in your new girlfriend’s bed? 
Is she your girlfriend? I think she is, right?
“It seems like you are pretty warm. I should check your body temperature as well.”
She inches her firm and strong hand down your neck slowly in an almost seductive matter.
You lay there trying to hold your voice.
“It’ seems like your clothes are in the way. Aren’t you feeling hot? Let’s take them off”.
“Haah...sure” you said. “Wait, what?
“To help you cool down. I know a thing or two.”
Moxy begins to help you out of your shirt and pants.
“There we go. That’s better, isn’t it?”
She begins to scan your entire body with her eyes like she is studying for some sort of exam.
“Is something wrong?” you try to break the silence that appeared from her looking at your body.
“N-no.” she sniffed “You know... I heard of a good way to get drugs out of your system is with a massage. Do you want to try it?”
“Sure... What harm could it be.” you smiled.
“Great. Let me grab what I need.”
You feel the bed shift in weight after she gets up.
She scampers off to the bathroom.
You hear a bunch of things rattling and clank in the other room.
What is she doing?
Eventually you see her return with a large towel and  bottles of various substances. one of them looks what it seems to be oil.
“Alright lay on this.” she said while laying out the towel on the bed.
Getting off the bed you reposition yourself onto the towel she prepared.
You watch her uncork the vial of oil. The smell of lemon and rosemary permeates the air.
She drizzles a little on your body, and you jump from how cold it is.
“Sorry” she said with a sheepish smile.
Beginning with small circles on your shoulders, she starts working it on your skin.
This feels good.
She's putting a good amount of strength into her motions.
After a while, she glides down to your chest. Moving back and forth like she's using a washboard but more gently and softly.
You feel her hands stop at your nipples in inconspicuous ways some times.
 It feels like she’s targeting them on purpose or something.
“M-moxy...” you said with an audible moan.
Suddenly you felt that she was becoming more aggressive with her massage. 
Feeling one hand snake down your thighs while the other hand kept playing with your nipples.
You decide to catch a glimpse of her face to see if she knows what she’s trying to do to you.
Her eyes are glowing with a predatory gleam.
“So cute..” you hear her whisper.
You feel her hands leave your body.
“Oh, I forgot. They said this method works the best if both people are naked during the process.”
How does that work?
You didn’t really argue because your brain is frazzled.
Watching her get up from the bed. You watch her squeeze her huge ass out of those pants and rip off that tight white t-shirt of hers from over her head. Looking at her skin, you notice that her cream coloured underbelly extends from under her chin all the way to the middle of her thighs. Her well defined abs were exposed right beneath those two large globes of breast meat jiggling from gravity. Taking off her bra, revealed two creamy coloured perfect shaped melons.  For how big they are, you are surprised they weren’t saggy.
Woah she has no hair down there.
Does she shave it? Or is it she can’t grow any down there?
Maybe she can’t grow any hair at all.
“Wheew Much better.” walking over to the bed, she sits beside your waist. “Do you want some help?”
“I-I got it.” you stuttered while shimmying out of out your boxers.
Your semi-erect cock flops out and catches Moxy’s attention.
Feeling her gaze on your cock you couldn’t help but get excited. 
I never showed my dick to a girl before.  So you don’t really know if she thinks it’s big enough for her.
Are shark guys usually bigger than human guys, right?
Interrupting your train of thought, you feel a breeze of air near your cock.
Looking down, you see Moxy eyes closed taking deep sniffs of your privates.
“Do I stink? Sorry, I’m all sweaty. I should have taken a shower first.”
“Smells pretty pungent but not in a bad way. It has that addictive funky smell that makes you go back for another taste.” she goes back down for another whiff. “Yea, I could get used to this smell.”
I guess she likes the smell of me. I think that’s a good thing. Right?
“Oooo..” you moaned as you felt something warm and slimy crawl up your shaft.
“Salty...”
Your cock starts to drip a little of precum from the tip.
Moxy sees this and extends the tip of her tongue to lick the clear dribbling liquid.
“Interesting.”
She positions her head directly above your shaft. You see her look up to you with her green orbs before she takes your whole cock into her chops.
“Shit...” you breathed heavily;y
Shivering from the wet and warm feeling that her mouth is giving you try your best not to move around so much. You remember that she has those sharp teeth of hers.
Feeling her lips tightly pressed against your groin, you feel her tongue begin to swirl around your meat stick. She begins to bob her head while in conjunction with the licking she’s doing in her mouth.
Moving in a hypnotizing motion, she slowly pulls back her head with a sucking motion all the way to the head where she gingerly laps her sharp tongue at your sensitive head. Then she pushes her head back down to the base of your cock to wildly churn her tongue around your whole cock.
It feels like she’s blowing,sucking and squeezing your dick all at the same time.
Instinctively you reach out your hands out to the back of Moxy’s head. Trying to guide her into a good rhythm.
You feel her moan, which causes a disturbingly pleasurable vibration on your cock.
This goes on for a while until she pulls her head back off your cock with a satisfying pop.
Licking her lips, she shoots you a smile.
“How’s the massage so far?”
“Awesome...”
“Good because I just got started.” she grinned
She climbs up on the bed and gestures you to lay your back on her knees.
Laying back on her firm, plump legs, you got as comfortable as you could.
Your vision obscures with her creamy tan boob in your face.
Smelling the lemon scent even stronger now you release a breath of tension.
“Relax and enjoy this,” she whispered gently and wraps her other arm behind your head.
Feeling a cold new substance hit your cock you shuddered from the surprise.
You feel a big warm hand start to pump your thick cock in quick full jerks.
Sounds of loud squelching and squishing fill the room.
Honestly, it sounds like you are fapping right now.
This is obviously not oil.
It feels way too good to be oil.
This is just a handjob, right? Why does it feel so good?
You feel a hot rising pressure build up deep inside of you and your cock twitches in response.
“Fuck...”
You usually can prevent yourself from coming so quickly, but it feels like she isn’t letting up so you can catch your breath.
Before you could pinpoint this feeling, she takes her hand off of your cock, exposing you to the colder air in the room.
You grunt in frustration. 
Before you can open your mouth to speak, you feel a hard nub poking you on your lips.
Opening your mouth, you begin to lick and suck the chewy nipple.
You hear her gasp out sighs of pleasure.
Hearing another squirt of liquid from a bottle.
Feeling a new addition of that cool liquid on your throbbing cock, she begins anew with the hand job.
 But this time in a slow, agonizing fashion.
This pace wasn’t as pleasurable as the first one.
It was like a mocking teasing motion.
You wanted more than this.
“ugh..” you groaned as you try to push your hips forward to thrust into her warm, soft hand.
Despite your desperate attempts to gain pleasure, she denies your thrusts by opening her hand as soon as you thrust..
“Your gonna have to try harder than that Anon. Show me that you want it,” she said with a seductive chuckle.
She placed her pointer finger and thumb at the top of your glands and your frenulum and began a twisting motion like she’s opening a bottle of soda.
You squirm from the direct pleasure of the attention that your cock head is getting.
Precum is leaking from your cock like a broken faucet.
That same feeling is coming back again with a strong surge of pleasure.
This is what you want. 
You excitedly began to bite her nipple like it was a signal to urge her on.
She feels your rapidly throbbing cock in her hand.
Once again, she takes her hand away from your dick.
You let out a whimper with a mouthful of boob.
“You wanna shoot your goo my dude? Hold out until I tell you to cum. Then I will I reward you.” she cooed into your ear.
Grunting into her breast to show your approval you feel another layer of jelly added to your cock.
This one makes you feel like your cock is on fire.
She grabs your dick with a slightly loose grip and begins a moderate rhythm.
Twisting and turning every other pump you feel your body getting drenched with sweat as she goes to town on your cock.
You can smell her body, giving off this sweet and sour scent. You are pretty sure she is just as excited as you are.
That itch in your body is coming back in full force. Your balls are now engorged from all of the denials of release.
 You want to feel that pleasure that is being denied from you.
She tightens her grip on your cock and switched up to stronger cleaner pumps
“Oh man dude I feel you throbbing. Do you like my hand-pussy that much? Do you want to come inside of it?”
You started thrusting to match the rhythm of her pumps.
“You like it when I call it that don’t you?” she said in a husky voice. “Go on try and to impregnate my hand-pussy Anon.”
She stopped her hand from moving and made you thrust into her hand.
“Come on! Show me how much you want to breed it!”
From the constant goading you grab her hand that she is using to jerk you off and began to thrust into it fervently.
At this point you were desperate.
You would do anything at this point to cum.
Working up a sweat you start pounding harder once you feel you body tense up.
“That’s it, Anon! Knock me up,” she yelled.
With one final thrust, you throw your whole hips into her hand before you feel yourself cum.
“MOXY!” you screamed.
Clenching her hand tightly, your body convulses with gratification.
A vision blinding light filled your eyes, your toes curled in pleasure as rope after rope of cum shot out of your  dick and into the air. Globs and globs of sticky white cum coats her Moxy’s hand, breasts and face.
AS the waves of delight dies down, you feel your sweaty body go limp.
You pant violently as you are out of breath.
“Damn dude, you got me good.”
Sounds like she is impressed.
Your brain is fried from this experience and can’t find the energy to respond.
“That was more fun than I imagined.” she snorted whiled sticking her tongue out to lick some of the cum off of her face.
The warm bed plus the coming down effects of the drugs makes your eyes heavy.
You wanted to clean yourself off before getting to sleep by your body says otherwise.
Fading off into sleep, you look at her one last time before closing your eyelids.

*** Moxy POV
Feeling the scalding hot dick milk splatter across your body, you began to start licking up the cum that was on your hand.
“Damn, he must have been back up.” cleaning the rest of the goo off of your hand with your mouth. “This doesn’t taste as bad people make it out to be.”
I should make him shoot it in my mouth next time.
He was thrusting so desperately into your hand. It was kinda cute.
Seeing him squirm underneath you ignites some sort of urge inside of you.
Looking down at the sleeping body on your thighs.
He really was tired huh. Guess being drugged out of your mind makes you feel tired sooner or later.
Your pussy is feeling unsatisfied, but you will bear with it for now.
Gotta keep your eyes on the prize baby. You gotta get him hooked on your love before you take a bite of the cake.
You contemplate about cleaning yourself off before getting in bed with Anon.
Fuck it you’ll just get the sheets washed tomorrow or something.
Laying down on the bed, you pulled Anon into your chest and began to spoon him. You wrap your arms around his body. 
His breathing, his heartbeat and his body heat you can feel them all at once. 
He is so...small. You just want to hide him away and keep him all to yourself.
This is fucking awesome. You could get used to this.
You wish you could stay like this forever.
“I love you, Anon.” you silently whisper into his ear.
Nuzzling the back of his neck, you feel him stir a bit from his sleep.
“So warm...” he grumbles.
You feel him scoot back deeper into your embrace.
Kissing him one last time on the cheek you begin drifting off to sleep.

Waking up groggily from slumber, you feel yourself doused in sweat. Looking behind you, you see a naked shark snoring happily.  The smell of cum permeated underneath the covers. You try to maneuver yourself to face her without trying to wake her up. Accomplishing this task rewarded you with two mounds of flesh in your vision.  

Remembering the escapes, the two of you had last night produced an urge for you to continue to suckle on one of the nubs of flesh presented before you.

Before you thought of the repercussions of your soon to be actions, you feel your lips move into action. Latching your mouth on her dark and chewy nipple, you began to lick and suck like a newborn baby. 

Feeling the nipple going erect in your mouth excited you. The taste was saltier than it was than last night.  Must have been the sweat from the two of you sleeping overnight.

Biting down on the nipple elicited a soft moan from the sleeping shark. Which you ignored due to being engrossed with playing with her tits.

“Isn’t a bit early for this? Besides...” you hear her say before feeling her hand reach down and grab your dick.

Wincing from the tenderness of your dick from last nights session made you release the nub from your mouth.

“You shouldn't start what you can’t finish,” she chuckled as she mounted you playfully.

Fuck that’s right you went right to sleep after you came and left her unsatisfied.
“Ahem sorry about last night. The least I could have done was helped you out when you were in need,” she said  as she cleared her throat

“Likewise. I could have at least gotten you off too instead of falling asleep like a jerk.” you apologized

“Don’t worry about it. Just say you owe me one.”

Noticing her sniffing the air, you realize she must have a stench that filled the room.

“Do you want to take a shower together?” you asked.

“You are getting bolder. I like it.” she cheekily grinned.

Rolling off your body, she gets off the bed and walks over to the bathroom.

Standing up off the bed, you get a chance to look around her bedroom some more.

It’s cluttered with clothes and a duffel bag. Either she just got back and town and didn’t unpack or the maid hasn’t been by yet. Moving over to the only desk in the room, you see it’s different body oils and lotions.

You guess even sharks need to take care of their skin.

You noticed there is a picture sitting on the desk. It seems to be of 2 older sharks, a gruff yet regal looking male and a firm but gentle looking female shark and a little girl shark wearing a cute white dress and a sun hat with a pink bow wrapped around the head of the hat. The little girl is looking at the camera with a huge smile.

Is this a childhood picture? She looks so cute in this. Her parents look nice. Kinda reminds you of your foster parent when you were a kid. Except that these two seem more content and caring than your foster parents.

“Anon! You coming?” you hear her call out.

“Yea. I'm on my way.”

Putting the pic back where you found it, you make your way back to the bathroom.

Walking into the spacious room which fit the modern yet futuristic vibe of the apartment. Everything you would expect of high-class living. One thing that is weird about this place is that everything is scaled a bit differently. Maybe taking her height and size into account, she gotten the whole loft customized to accommodate her.
You see her standing at a clear shower enclosure with the door open.
It must be one of those showers without the tub.

 Fancy.

Making your way inside the chamber, she follows behind you and closes the door.

From the inside, it feels like you are in some laboratory or a spaceship bathroom.

Moving up to the panel on the wall, you ask her. “How does this thing work?”

“All you gotta do is push the button,” she says as she walks up to the panel and slaps the button.

Suddenly you feel a blast of lukewarm water spray across your body.
“Woah!” you squeaked.

“I’m gonna make it a little warmer.” she giggled as she played with the panel on the wall.

The water started to come out of the head like a waterfall, and the temperature of the water climbed to a comfortable amount of heat. Droplets of water began to drizzle across your skin.

“It feels like I’m standing out in the rain.”

“Yup. This is my favorite part of this shower.”

AS your body got used to the feeling of the shower, you watched Moxy start to do stretches inside of the chamber.

Flexing her taut back muscles in a show-off kind way that makes you feel like she is showing off to you. It’s hard not to imagine her posing like a Greek god for one of those marble sculptures.

“W-What are you doing?” you ask in wonder.

“Just stretching,” she said in a drawn out way. “The warm water helps me stretch better.”

You see her turn her back towards you as spread her legs in a wide-legged stance and slowly bent forward.

In this position, you can clearly see her pussy. It feels like she is presenting herself to you in an almost attractive way. Seeing the water flowing down her body is bringing life back into your previously fallen fellow.

Slowly you make your way over to the stretching shark with your sword fully drawn. She seemed to notice you behind her but paid no care to your actions.

Kneeling down you come face to face with her blooming flower. Realing this is your first time actually seeing a vagina in person.

Curiosity overcame you as you began to open your mouth for a taste of the fruit before you. Looking for her reaction to your action, you decide to keep going until she decides to stop you. Due to the water flooding down her back, you can only taste a hint of salt and some indescribable flavor that’s not exactly untasty.

You can feel her shutter every time you pass your quick and agile tongue by her throbbing nub at the top of her pussy. You greedily took the bud into your mouth before slowly sucking on it. The shower has stopped running, and only the sounds of Moxy’s shaky moans sounded out in the bathroom.

“M-More...Harder.” you hear her say as she stood on the tips of her toes to give you a better angle to attack her pussy.

Obliging her request you begin to alternate between nibbling and sucking on her clit. In return greatly pleasured the shark female.
Feeling your mouth getting, tired you stop to rest a bit. Aggravated that you stopped, she urged you to fuck her now. Standing up to align your throbbing member up to her sopping wet fuckhole. 

Pressing into her with a small, thrust you feel your cock throb with glee as a new sensation enveloped it. Try tong not be overwhelmed by this feeling her pussy seemed to have a mind of its own. 

Constantly squeezing you like it’s scared you are going to escape from its clutches. Lost in the waves of pleasure you are feeling right now you began to mindlessly thrust into that hole that is so welcoming to your cock. Sounds of slapping echoed throughout the chamber followed by husky moans. Your hands start roaming across the front side of her toned body. Whether it’s playing with her massive soft boobs or trailing your finger across her hard abs, you gave her the attention she wanted.

Suddenly your cock started to throb erratically and almost like a signal Moxy knew it what she wanted was near.

“Let’s change positions. I want you to kiss me when you cum,”she said.

Being a man who aims to please you pull your cock out of her pussy and spin her around to face you.

She spreads her legs while placing her back on the wall for support.
Lining your cock up to her pussy you restarted your efforts to bring her to climax.

Pressing your entire length slowly into her inviting pussy before speeding up with quick short thrusts.

It didn’t take long for her pussy to knead your cock into submission. You feel her hands guide your hips into her snatch. The throbbing came back in full, force, and that burning feeling is crawling inside of you again.

“Moxy. I can’t hold it back anymore.”

“Go, ahead let it out. I’m almost there too.” she urged.

You pump a few more times before you thrust into her for the last time. The cloud nine feelings arrived, and her pussy seemed to be eager for the incoming sperm since it was twisting and sucking like a mouth. Deciding to give it what it wants you began to fire off cum inside of her.

“Shit shit shit” she panicked as she tensed up from the orgasm she got from the feeling of hot cum hitting her walls.

You lean forward to deliver a kiss on the glazed-eyed Moxy that’s riding the waves of her orgasm. She absentmindedly returns the kiss.

“Did I pay you back for...last night yet?” you say in-between breaths.

“Totally. That felt way too good. I think I may be addicted to your dick dude.” she said with a lazy smile.

“Isn’t a bit too late to stroke my ego? I mean I already made you mine” you said as you pulled your cock out of her pussy.

A stream of cum starts to dribble from her pussy. She pulls some of it out and starts playing with it.

“This shit feels like lava when you shot it inside. of me”

“Stop playing with it and get washed up. I want to get out of here before something else happens and my penis falls off from overuse.”

“That’s quite the commanding tone you have there. After coming inside me you must feel like you own me, huh?”

“Technically, we own each other.”

“Well go on and wash me then. Since you own my body.” she smirked with a smug expression.

“I will do you if you do me. Deal?”

“Sure.”

After washing each others bodies, we got out and dried each other off as well.
 
“Hehe this is like something out of those movies right” she chuckled.

“Maybe? Didn’t watch too many movies.”

“You haven’t seen Shamrock Valley? ‘The vows we exchange here are the chains of our love that will shackle us together forever.’ Does that ring a bell?”

“Nope.”

That line sounds like something that would come out of some sappy romance novel.

“Starlight at Dusk? Escaping from Death’s Hold? Martyrdom?”

“No, no, and no.”

“Jeez. You haven’t seen anything, have you. Looks like I need to teach you about the wonders of film.”

“Uh, huh, sure. Can we get something to eat now?”

“I’m starving too. Oh shit! I can teach you about movies over breakfast. I know a diner than makes slamming eggs.” she moved over and slapped you on the back.

Slammin eggs?

 She has a unique way of talking for a hopeless romantic, rich girl.
Kinda counter-intuitive but cute and refreshing nonetheless.

Picking up the clothes you had last night you realized that they were pretty soiled from the previous night

Well, the shirt was done, but the pants were ok if you free ball it. 
Maybe Moxy would have a shirt I could borrow or something.

“Hey Moxy do you have a shirt I could wear until I can get something from my place?”

“Uhh...Yeah, I think I have something.” she scurries over to a corner to dig in a bo,x. “Ah, here it is.” She pulls out a grey t-shirt that looks like a gym uniform top.

“Upper Ripperton High Varsity Volleyball team? You played volleyball?”

“Did you expect me to play tennis or some shit? Volleyball is like child’s play for me. I was the ace of the team.”

“Really? Did you guys win a bunch?”

“Fuck yea. Carried my team all the way to finals before I quit the team.” she bragged
“Oh shit nice.”

“Wel-Wait don’t you want to know why?!” she said irritably

“I mean if you want to tell me sure, but I understand that high school is a fickle thing. I quit so many clubs that I was good at just because I didn’t find it fun anymore.”

“Such a killjoy,” she grumbled

‘Besides I got the real prize in the end. The old sweaty t-shirt of the former ace of the Upper Ripperton High Varsity Volleyball team.” You hold the shirt up to your face to take deep whiffs of the old uniform.

“S-Shut up! I’m pretty sure I washed that shirt before tossing it in that box.

“Nope I smell that musky odor of sweat and determination of a young teen Moxy,” you said dreamily.

“Getting off to the smell highschool girls, huh. You know what. I’m taking that shirt back. Give it here.”

“You can’t take this shirt away from me.”

“Why not?”

“Because this shirt is a symbol of the exchange we took as lovers that chains us together. And besides there are no take backs” you said as you playfully stuck out your tongue.

“Fine. Keep the stupid thing,” she grumbled. “Let’s go eat something.”

“Sure.”
 
---
The trip to the car was, even more, weirder than the journey to the apartment.

As soon as you got off the private elevator, the lobby was flooded with activity. People in crisps suits, elegant dresses, and other critical looking figures were moving throughout the lobby.

You had to hold Moxy’s hand because you felt like you would have gotten lost in the sea. Plus she could protect you from getting your hide ripped off by any of the bigwig's bodyguards.

What a man you become.

Moxy walked to the front desk to talk to some dude in a red hat which you probably assume is the valet.

As she came back, she guided you to an exit of the building to see a black colored SUV parked out front.

“That’s a nice car,” you say.

“It’s ok. I use it mostly when I do errands.”

The valet ran over to deliver the keys to the SUV to Moxy.

“Here you go, Ma’am.”


Moxy grabbed the keys and ushered you to get in the car.
Hopping into the large car, you noticed how everything she owns is customized to her liking.

The seats felt bigger, and there was little more leg room.

But you have no idea what an SUV usually is like so you can only just assume.

“So what kind of music do you like to listen to?”

“Depends on my mood. Jazz and Rap, mostly. I used to listen to a lot of local bands play down at the coffee shop when I was younger. I have a big soft spot for dad rock, though.”

“Was any of the groups good?”

“I had a couple I liked. Dunno if they still play. Been a couple of years since I was last down there.”

“We should go down there someday. Sounds like fun.”

“If you want to sure. But now it’s chow time.”

Pulling up to to a chrome shelled building which you can only assume to be the diner she’s talking about. It truly does gives off the 20th-century Diner vibe.

 The two of you hop out of the car into the warm summer morning air.

“This weather isn’t so bad in the morning. It gets way too hot in the afternoon though,” you say as you breathe in the warm, dry air.

“You’ll get used to it. That burn starts to feel nice, and you will get to the point where you start liking sweating.”

“I think that’s just a trait you have, you gym shark.” you rub the sweat from your brow.

“You could use a little gym in your life,” she says as she pinches your flabby waist.

“This is just a bit of baby fat.” you joke.

“I dunno about that. You were pretty out of breath in the shower.”

“You weren’t complaining as I recall.”

“It was just so cute seeing you trying to please me.”

“I’ll remember that next time I have you squirming underneath me,” you say as you playfully bump into her.

“Likewise shrimp,” she says as she returns your bump.

Walking into the diner’s entrance. The place was kinda empty. Looks like the aftermath of an early morning rush. The smell of hot coffee and frying bacon invades your nose.

It’s been a while since you last had an actual breakfast.

Usually, you skipped breakfast to get extra time to sleep in. At most, you had a bowl a cereal in the morning.

You see a middle age female shark in a waitress outfit walked towards the two of you with a smile.

“Is that my little girl, Moxy? How have ya been, shug?”

“Things are looking better, Cheryl. Long time no see.”

“That’s great. Parent's been doing, ok? Haven’t seen them around here in a while."

“Yeah, they have just been busy.”

“Aren’t we all. The tourist season is here, and this place is getting more work than last season. It’s a good thing, but I don’t know if these old bones of mine can handle it,” she said jokingly.

She looks over to you with a questioning look.

“Who is this young man?”

“He is my uhh...” she said hesitantly.

“I’m her boyfriend. My name is Anon. Nice to meet you ma’am.” you offered your hand out for her to shake.

“Oh my how interesting.” she meets you for a handshake. “ Seems like my little girl grew up so fast.”

You reach over to grab Moxy’s hand with your own.

Moxy seems to be looking at you with a dazed expression with a small blush on her face.

“Well let’s get you two love birds seated then,” Cheryl says with a bubbly expression.

Following behind Cheryl, you drag Moxy by the hand to the booth in the corner of the Diner.

“Here’s a little spot where the two of you can dine with a little privacy,” she says with a wink.

Both of you sit down and decide to get some water and orange juice.

“Mkay I’ll be right back with your menus and drinks,” she says as she walks off away from the table.

You feel a sharp gaze piercing from your aquatic lover across the booth.

“What’s up?” you ask, earnestly.

“Why did you embarrass me like that back there?”

“How did I do that?”

Seeing a pink blush creep up on he,r face she begins to stutter.
“I-I can tell people that we are b-boyfriend and girlfriend. I’m not THAT embarrassed.”

Is she upset over that? That is so cute.

“Oh, that’s a relief. I can rely on you from now to do the talking.” you snorted.

You see her look down at her fingers and begin fidgeting with them.
“Yeah sure,” she says with a whisper.

Letting out a deep sigh, you move over to grab her fingers to get her attention.

“Listen, it’s no big deal if you aren’t used to telling people about our relationship. This is a new experience for both of us, and it’s gonna take some time to get used to.”

Your hands find their way to lock with hers.

“Besides, aren’t you excited?? This is kinda like our first date together,” you say with a goofy smile.

“Yeah you are right. I guess I’m not as used to doing these things as I thought I was.”

“Great now give me a kiss,” you say as you lean over the table while sticking your lips out with a puckering motion.

“H-Here? Really? What if someone sees us?”

“ Who cares? I am just giving a quick kiss to my girlfriend. What’s wrong with that? Besides we are in the corner so no one can see us anyway.”

“Fine...”

She leans in to meet your lips in the middle of the table and gives you a big smooch.

Originally you intended for this to be a quick peck but as soon as those velvety lips met, yours the kiss went on five seconds longer than you expected.

“Oh my. You kids are getting friskier than I remember.” Cheryl says.
Hearing the older waitress’s voice, you see Moxy quickly pull away and turn her head from embarrassment.

“It must be the summer air ma’am. This city has a certain effect, on me, I guess,” you said.

She places the drinks and menus down on the table before pulling out her notepad with a fluid motion.

“The city has that effect on some people. Just make sure you are responsible for the outcomes” she winks at you.

“I plan too.”

“W-What are you two talking about?! Can we order now, Cheryl?”

“Okie Dokie! What can I get you two lovebirds?” she said smugly.

“I’ll have the usual,” Moxy said.

“I’ll just get what she is having.”

“Alright 2 specials coming right up,” Cheryl says while writing it on a notepad.

She takes the menus back and walks off from the table.